Hawaii, session 2025, SB933.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: PART I.  GENERAL PROVISIONS Section 1.  SHORT TITLE.  This Act shall be known and may be cited as the Grant Funding Act of 2025. SECTION 2. The legislature finds that the federal funding freeze imposed by the United States Office of Management and Budget may have detrimental effects on Hawaii's nonprofit sector, which provides critical services in health and human services.  Without assistance from the federal government, Hawaii's federally qualified health centers, and programs that provide child care, social services, subsidized housing, and homeless services, will see a significant drop in funding. The purpose of this Act is to provide one-time nonrecurring grants to organizations that provide critical services, in accordance with chapter 42F, Hawaii Revised Statutes. SECTION 3. The legislature finds and declares that the grants made pursuant to chapter 42F, Hawaii Revised Statutes, under this Act are in the public interest and for the public health, safety, and general welfare. SECTION 4. DEFINITIONS.  Unless otherwise clear from the context, as used in this Act: "Expending agency" means the executive department, independent commission, bureau, office, board, or other establishment of the state government (other than the legislature and office of Hawaiian affairs), the judiciary, the political subdivisions of the State, or any quasi‑public institution supported in whole or in part by state funds, which is authorized to expend specified appropriations made by this Act. Abbreviations, where used to denote the expending agency, shall mean the following: AGR  Department of agriculture AGS  Department of accounting and general services ATG  Department of the attorney general BED  Department of business, economic development, and tourism BUF  Department of budget and finance CCA  Department of commerce and consumer affairs DEF  Department of defense EDN  Department of education GOV  Office of the governor HHL  Department of Hawaiian home lands HMS  Department of human services HRD  Department of human resources development HTH  Department of health JUD  Judiciary LBR  Department of labor and industrial relations LNR  Department of land and natural resources LTG  Office of the lieutenant governor PSD  Department of public safety SUB  Subsidies TAX  Department of taxation TRN  Department of transportation UOH  University of Hawaii CCH  City and county of Honolulu COH  County of Hawaii COK  County of Kauai COM  County of Maui "Means of financing" or "MOF" means the source from which funds are appropriated or authorized to be expended for the programs and projects specified in this Act.  All appropriations are followed by letter symbols.  The letter symbols, where used, shall have the following meanings: A    General funds B    Special funds C    General obligation bond fund D    General obligation bond fund with debt service cost to be paid from special funds E    Revenue bond funds J    Federal aid interstate funds K    Federal aid primary funds L    Federal aid secondary funds M    Federal aid urban funds N    Federal funds P    Other federal funds R    Private contributions S    County funds T    Trust funds U    Interdepartmental transfers W    Revolving funds X    Other funds "Program ID" means the unique identifier for the specific program and consists of the abbreviation for the organization responsible for carrying out the program followed by the organization number for the program. PART II. PROGRAM APPROPRIATIONS - EXECUTIVE BRANCH SECTION 5.  APPROPRIATIONS.   The legislature finds that the grant recipients named in this part have applied for a grant pursuant to section 42F-102, Hawaii Revised Statutes, and qualify to receive a grant pursuant to section 42F-103, Hawaii Revised Statutes. The appropriations shall be disbursed by a contract between the named expending agency and the grant recipient pursuant to sections 42F-104, 42F-105, and 42F-106, Hawaii Revised Statutes. Further, the legislature finds and declares that the grants are in the public interest and for the public health, safety, and general welfare of the State.  The following sums, or so much thereof as may be sufficient to accomplish the purposes and programs designated herein, are hereby appropriated or authorized, as the case may be, from the means of financing specified to the expending agencies designated for the fiscal biennium beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027.  The total expenditures and the number of positions in each fiscal year of the biennium shall not exceed the sums and the position ceilings indicated for each fiscal year, except as provided elsewhere in this Act or as provided by general law. PROGRAM APPROPRIATIONS APPROPRIATIONS ITEM NO. PROG. ID PROGRAM EXPENDING AGENCY FISCAL YEAR 2025-2026 M O F A.  ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT B.  EMPLOYMENT C.  TRANSPORTATION FACILITIES D.  ENVIRONMENTAL PROTECTION E.  HEALTH F.  SOCIAL SERVICES G.  FORMAL EDUCATION H.  CULTURE AND RECREATION I.  PUBLIC SAFETY J.  INDIVIDUAL RIGHTS K.  GOVERNMENT-WIDE SUPPORT PART III.  SPECIAL PROVISIONS - EXECUTIVE BRANCH SECTION 6. The governor may supplement funds for any cost element for a capital improvement project authorized under this Act by transferring sums as may be needed from the funds appropriated for any other cost element of the same project by this Act or any other prior or future Act that has not lapsed; provided that the total expenditure of funds for all cost elements shall not exceed the total appropriations for that project; provided further that the governor shall submit a report to the legislature of all uses of this authority for the previous twelve-month period from December 1 to November 30 no later than thirty days prior to the convening of the regular sessions of 2026 and 2027. SECTION 7. Any provision of this Act to the contrary notwithstanding, the appropriations made for capital improvement projects authorized under this Act shall not lapse at the end of the fiscal biennium for which the appropriation is made; provided that all appropriations made to be expended in fiscal biennium 2025-2027 that are unencumbered as of June 30, 2028, shall lapse as of that date; provided further that this lapsing date shall not apply to non‑general fund appropriations for projects described in this Act where the appropriations have been deemed necessary to qualify for federal aid financing and reimbursement; provided further that those non-general fund appropriations that are unencumbered as of June 30, 2029, shall lapse as of that date. SECTION 8. In releasing funds for capital improvement projects, the governor shall consider legislative intent and the objectives of the user agency and its programs; the scope and level of the user agency's intended service; and the means, efficiency, and economics by which the project will meet the objectives of the user agency and the State; provided that agencies responsible for construction shall take into consideration legislative intent, the objectives of the user agency and its programs, and the scope and level of the user agency's intended service and construct the improvement to meet the objectives of the user agency in the most efficient and economical manner possible. SECTION 9. With the approval of the governor, designated expending agencies for capital improvement projects authorized in this Act may delegate to other state or county agencies the implementation of projects when it is determined advantageous to do so by both the original expending agency and the agency to which expending authority is to be delegated; provided that the governor shall submit a report to the legislature of all uses of this authority for the previous twelve-month period from December 1 to November 30 no later than thirty days prior to the convening of the regular sessions of 2026 and 2027. SECTION 10. No appropriation authorized in this Act for expenditure by a political subdivision of the State shall be considered to be a mandate to undertake new programs or to increase the level of services under existing programs of that political subdivision.  If any appropriation authorized in this Act constitutes a mandate within the provisions of section 5 of article VIII of the Hawaii State Constitution, the authorization shall be void and, in the case of capital improvement appropriations designated to be financed from the general obligation bond fund, the total general obligation bonds authorized for those projects shall be correspondingly decreased. SECTION 11. Whenever the expending agency to which an appropriation is made is changed due to legislation enacted during any session of the legislature that affects the appropriations made by this Act, the governor shall transfer the necessary funds and positions to the proper expending agency as provided by law. SECTION 12. If the State should assume the direct operation of any non-governmental agency receiving state funds under the provisions of this Act, all related state funds shall constitute a credit to the State against the costs of acquiring all or any portion of the property, real, personal, or mixed, of the non-governmental agency.  This credit shall be applicable regardless of when the acquisition takes place. SECTION 13. Where an agency is authorized to secure funds or other property from private organizations or individuals to be expended or utilized in connection with any authorized program, the agency, with the governor's approval, may enter into the undertaking; provided that the provisions of the undertaking comply with applicable state constitutional and statutory requirements; provided further that the governor shall submit a report to the legislature of all uses of this authority for the previous twelve-month period from December 1 to November 30 no later than thirty days prior to the convening of the regular sessions of 2026 and 2027. SECTION 14. Except as otherwise provided by general law, negotiations for the purchase of land by state agencies shall be subject to the approval of the governor and the department of land and natural resources or other appropriate agency; provided that private lands may be acquired for the purpose of exchange for federal lands when the department of land and natural resources and the governor determine that the acquisition and exchange are necessary for the completion of any project specifically authorized by this Act. SECTION 15. With the approval of the governor, expending agencies that use appropriations authorized in part II of this Act for planning, land acquisition, design, construction, and equipment for repair and alterations may delegate that responsibility and transfer funds to public works  planning, design, and construction (AGS221) for the implementation of the repair and alterations when it is determined by the agencies that it is advantageous to do so; provided that the governor shall submit to the legislature a summary report of all uses of this authority for the previous twelve-month period from December 1 to November 30 no later than thirty days prior to the convening of the regular sessions of 2026 and 2027. PART IV. PROGRAM APPROPRIATIONS - JUDICIARY SECTION 16. APPROPRIATIONS.  The legislature finds that the grant recipients named in this part have applied for a grant pursuant to section 42F-102, Hawaii Revised Statutes, and qualify to receive a grant pursuant to section 42F-103, Hawaii Revised Statutes. The appropriations shall be disbursed by a contract between the named expending agency and the grant recipient pursuant to sections 42F-104, 42F-105, and 42F-106, Hawaii Revised Statutes.  Further, the legislature finds and declares that the grants are in the public interest and for the public health, safety, and general welfare of the State.  The following sums, or so much thereof as may be sufficient to accomplish the purposes and programs designated herein, are hereby appropriated or authorized, as the case may be, from the means of financing specified to the expending agencies designated for the fiscal biennium beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027.  The total expenditures and the number of positions in each fiscal year of the biennium shall not exceed the sums and the position ceilings indicated for each fiscal year, except as provided elsewhere in this Act or as provided by general law. PROGRAM APPROPRIATIONS APPROPRIATIONS ITEM NO. PROG. ID PROGRAM EXPENDING AGENCY FISCAL YEAR 2025-2026 M O F A.  JUDICIARY PART V.  SPECIAL PROVISIONS - JUDICIARY SECTION 17. The chief justice may supplement funds for any cost element for a capital improvement project authorized under this Act by transferring sums as may be needed from the funds appropriated for any other cost element of the same project by this Act or any other prior or future Act that has not lapsed; provided that the total expenditure of funds for all cost elements shall not exceed the total appropriations for that project; provided further that the chief justice shall submit a report to the legislature of all uses of this authority for the previous twelve-month period from December 1 to November 30 no later than thirty days prior to the convening of the regular sessions of 2026 and 2027. SECTION 18. Any provision of this Act to the contrary notwithstanding, the appropriations made for capital improvement projects authorized under this Act shall not lapse at the end of the fiscal biennium for which the appropriation is made; provided that all appropriations made to be expended in fiscal biennium 2025-2027 that are unencumbered as of June 30, 2028, shall lapse as of that date; provided further that this lapsing date shall not apply to non‑general fund appropriations for projects described in this Act where the appropriations have been deemed necessary to qualify for federal aid financing and reimbursement; provided further that those non-general fund appropriations that are unencumbered as of June 30, 2029, shall lapse as of that date. SECTION 19. In releasing funds for capital improvement projects, the chief justice shall consider legislative intent and the objectives of the judiciary and its programs; the scope and level of the judiciary 's intended service; and the means, efficiency, and economics by which the project will meet the objectives of the judiciary and the State; provided that judiciary shall take into consideration legislative intent, the objectives of the responsible for construction and its programs, and the scope and level of the judiciary's intended service and construct the improvement to meet the objectives of the user agency in the most efficient and economical manner possible. SECTION 20. With the approval of the chief justice, the judiciary may delegate to other state or county agencies the implementation of projects when it is determined advantageous to do so by both the judiciary and the agency to which expending authority is to be delegated; provided that the chief justice shall submit a report to the legislature of all uses of this authority for the previous twelve-month period from December 1 to November 30 no later than thirty days prior to the convening of the regular sessions of 2026 and 2027. SECTION 21. No appropriation authorized in this Act for expenditure by the judiciary shall be considered to be a mandate to undertake new programs or to increase the level of services under existing programs of the judiciary.  If any appropriation authorized in this Act constitutes a mandate within the provisions of section 5 of article VIII of the Hawaii State Constitution, the authorization shall be void and, in the case of capital improvement appropriations designated to be financed from the general obligation bond fund, the total general obligation bonds authorized for those projects shall be correspondingly decreased. SECTION 22. Whenever the expending agency to which an appropriation is made is changed due to legislation enacted during any session of the legislature that affects the appropriations made by this Act, the chief justice shall transfer the necessary funds and positions to the proper expending agency as provided by law. SECTION 23. If the State should assume the direct operation of any non-governmental agency receiving state funds under the provisions of this Act, all related state funds shall constitute a credit to the State against the costs of acquiring all or any portion of the property, real, personal, or mixed, of the non-governmental agency.  This credit shall be applicable regardless of when the acquisition takes place. SECTION 24. Where the judiciary is authorized to secure funds or other property from private organizations or individuals to be expended or utilized in connection with any authorized program, the agency, with the chief justice's approval, may enter into the undertaking; provided that the provisions of the undertaking comply with applicable state constitutional and statutory requirements; provided further that the chief justice shall submit a report to the legislature of all uses of this authority for the previous twelve-month period from December 1 to November 30 no later than thirty days prior to the convening of the regular sessions of 2026 and 2027. SECTION 25. Except as otherwise provided by general law, negotiations for the purchase of land by state agencies shall be subject to the approval of the chief justice and the department of land and natural resources or other appropriate agency; provided that private lands may be acquired for the purpose of exchange for federal lands when the department of land and natural resources and the chief justice determine that the acquisition and exchange are necessary for the completion of any project specifically authorized by this Act. SECTION 26. With the approval of the chief justice, expending agencies that use appropriations authorized in part IV of this Act for planning, land acquisition, design, construction, and equipment for repair and alterations may delegate that responsibility and transfer funds to public works  planning, design, and construction (AGS221) for the implementation of the repair and alterations when it is determined by the agencies that it is advantageous to do so; provided that the chief justice shall submit to the legislature a summary report of all uses of this authority for the previous twelve-month period from December 1 to November 30 no later than thirty days prior to the convening of the regular sessions of 2026 and 2027. PART VI. MISCELLANEOUS AND EFFECTIVE DATE SECTION 27. (a)  An organization shall not receive grant moneys pursuant to this Act unless the organization: (1)  Provides crucial programmatic aid and outreach in the health, human services, or legal representation sector; (2)  Normally receives substantial federal funding for the purpose of program operations; (3)  Is considered at a risk of losing, or receiving a significantly decreased amount of, federal funding if the suspension or termination of funding occurs; and (4)  Agrees to be subject to audits conducts by the State, or any contracted entity of the State, to ensure the organization's use of moneys authorized by this Act is consistent with the purposes of this Act. (b) Each organization that receives grant moneys pursuant to this Act shall provide to the legislature, no later than twenty days prior to the convening of the regular session of 2026, a report to the legislature that includes: (1)  The specific sources of federal funding for the organization from which funding has been suspended or terminated; (2)  The reasons why funding may be affected by the suspension or termination of funding; and (3)  Detailed, itemized explanations regarding how moneys provided by the Act shall be used to supplant suspended or terminated federal funding. SECTION 28. If any portion of this Act or its application to any person, entity, or circumstance is held to be invalid for any reason, the legislature declares that the remainder of the Act and each and every other provision thereof shall not be affected thereby.  If any portion of a specific appropriation is held to be invalid for any reason, the remaining portion shall be expended to fulfill the objective of that appropriation to the extent possible. SECTION 29. If manifest clerical, typographical, or other mechanical errors are found in this Act, the governor or the chief of justice, as the case may be, may correct the errors. SECTION 30. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2050.